dictionaries/tlh/index.aff
# Author: Pander <pander@users.sourceforge.net>
# License: Apache License 2.0
# Homepage: https://github.com/PanderMusubi/klingon
# Version: 1.0.9
# Date: 2022-05-08 07:52:45
# Source: build from boQwI' version 2.0
SET UTF-8
TRY hgc
WORDCHARS c’
SFX E Y 1
SFX E 0  .
SFX L Y 1
SFX L 0  .
SFX N Y 25
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX N 0  .
SFX O Y 1
SFX O 0  .
SFX V Y 38
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
SFX V 0  .
PFX v Y 28
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
PFX v 0  .
