dictionaries/tlh/index.dic
/NO
/vV
/N
/NL
/NL
/NO
/vV
/NL
/NE
/N
/vV
/NE
/NE
/NL
/NO
 /N
/NE
/NL
/NOvV
/NO
/NO
/NL
/NL
/vV
/NO
/NE
/NE
/NO
   /NL
 /NL
   /NL
/N
/NL
/NL
/NE
/NL
/NE
/NL
/NvV
/vV
/NL
/NL
 /N
 /NL
/NL
/NL
/NE
/NL
/N
/NE
/NE
/NE
/NO
/vV
/NL
/NL
/N
/NE
 /N
/NL
/NL
/NE
/NO
/N
/NL
/NvVL
/N
/NL
/NL
/NL
/NE
/N
/NO
/NL
/NL
/NE
 /NE
/vV
/NL
 /N
/NL
/NE
/NL
/NE
/NL
/NE
/NL
/NE
/NE
/vV
/NE
/NE
/NO
/N
/NO
/N
  /NE
/NL
/vV
/N
/NE
/vV
/NE
/N
/NE
/NO
 /N
/NL
/NL
/vV
/NE
/N
/NO
/vV
 /N
/NE
/NE
/N
/NO
 /N
/NO
/NO
/NvV
/NE
/NL
 /N
/NE
/NL
/NE
/NL
/NE
 /N
/vV
/NO
/N
/vV
/NL
/NL
/NO
/vVN
/NOvV
/NO
/N
/vV
/NE
/NE
/NE
/NE
 /N
  /NE
/vV
/N
/vV
/N
/NL
/vV
/NL
/NE
/N
/NE
/vV
/NE
/vV
/N
 /NE
/vV
 /NE
/vVNO
 /N
/NE
 /NO
/vV
/NE
/NE
/NOvV
 /NO
/NO
/vV
 /N
/NL
/NE
/NO
  /NL
/NL
/NL
/NO
/vV
/NE
  /N
/NE
/NE
/N
/NO
 /NO
/vV
/NO
/NO
/NL
 /NL
/N
/NL
/NO
 /N
/vV
/vV
/NvV
/NE
/NvV
/N
/NO
/NE
/N
/vV
/NL
/vV
/NO
/vV
/N
/vV
 /NL
/vVNO
 /N
/NE
/NE
/vV
/N
/NE
/NE
/NL
/vV
/N
/NL
/NE
/NL
/NL
 /NL
/NO
/NE
/NO
 /NL
/NL
/NL
/vVN
/N
/vV
/NL
/NL
/NL
 /N
/vV
 /N
/vVNL
/NO
/NLvV
/NL
/N
/vV
/NE
/NE
/NE
/vVNL
/N
/NO
/vV
/NL
/N
/vV
/NO
/vV
/NE
/vVN
/NL
/NL
/NL
 /N
/NL
/NE
/NL
/NL
/vV
/N
/NL
/NL
 /NL
/NL
/N
/vV
/NE
/NL
/N
/NL
/vV
/NL
/N
/NE
/NE
/NE
/NL
/vVN
/N
/NL
/NO
/NE
/vV
/NL
 /N
/NO
 /N
/NL
/NO
/NL
/N
/NE
/vV
/NE
/vV
/N
/vV
/NE
/NO
/N
/vV
/NO
/vV
/vVNL
/NE
/N
/NO
/N
 /NL
/NE
/N
/NO
/vVN
/NO
/NL
/NO
/NE
/vV
 /N
/vVN
/NL
 /N
/NO
/NvVL
/vV
/NE
/N
/vVN
 /NE
/vVN
/vV
/NO
/NO
/N
/vV
/NOvV
/NE
/N
/NO
/vV
/NO
/N
/NO
/NE
/vV
/NL
/N
/NL
/NL
/vV
 /NL
/N
/NO
/NvV
/N
/NE
/NE
/N
/NO
/vVN
/NE
/N
/NE
/vV
/NL
/NOvV
/NE
/NL
/N
/NE
/vV
/vV
/NE
/N
/NE
/NO
/NOvV
/vV
/N
/vV
/N
/vV
 /NE
/NE
/NO
/vV
 /N
/NE
/vV
/NL
/NL
/N
/vV
/NL
/NE
/NL
/vV
/NL
/NL
/NE
/vV
/NE
/NE
/N
/NL
 /NL
/vV
 /NL
/NEvV
/NL
/NvV
/N
/vV
/NvV
/NO
/NvV
/NL
 /N
/NL
/NOvV
/NO
/NE
/NO
/NE
/vVN
/NLvV
/NOvV
/N
   /NL
/NO
/vV
/N
/NE
/NE
/NL
/vV
/vVNO
/N
/vV
/NO
/N
/NE
/N
/vVNO
/vV
/NO
/NO
 /N
/NO
/N
/NL
/NL
/NvV
   /N
/NL
/NL
/NL
 /NE
/NL
/N
/NE
/NL
/NE
/NL
/N
/NO
/NO
/vVN
/N
/NE
 /N
/NE
/NO
/NO
/vV
 /N
 /NL
/N
/vV
/NE
/NO
 /NL
/vV
/NO
/NL
/vV
 /N
/NE
/vV
/N
/NO
/vV
/NE
 /N
/NL
/NvV
/NO
 /NO
/NO
/NL
/NO
 /N
/vVN
/NO
 /N
/NO
/NO
 /N
/vVN
/NL
/NL
/N
/NO
/NvV
/N
/NO
/NO
/NO
/vV
/vV
/vVN
/vV
/NE
/vV
 /N
/NO
/vV
/NO
 /NE
/vV
/vV
/N
/vV
/NO
/N
/NE
/NO
/NL
/vV
/NO
/N
/NE
/NL
/NE
/vV
/NE
/NE
/NO
/NE
/NL
/vV
 /N
/vV
/NE
/NO
/NL
/NL
/NL
 /N
/NL
/NE
 /N
/NO
/vV
/N
/NE
/vV
/NO
/NL
/N
/vV
 /NL
/NvV
/NL
/NvV
/NO
/vV
/NE
/NO
/NO
/vV
/NE
/NE
/NE
/vV
/vV
/NL
/NE
/NO
/NO
/N
/NL
/NE
/vV
/vVNO
/NL
/NO
/NE
/NL
/NO
/vV
/NL
/NE
/vVN
/vV
/NO
/NE
/NO
/vV
/NL
/NE
/NE
/NL
/N
/vV
/NO
/NO
/NO
/NL
/NE
/NEvV
/NO
/NE
/vV
/N
 /NL
/vVN
 /NE
 /NE
 /N
/NE
/NE
/NE
/NO
/vV
/N
/vV
/NO
/vV
/NE
/NL
/NvV
/NE
/NL
/NO
/vV
/NO
/NE
/NO
/vV
 /NL
/N
/NO
/NE
/NO
/NO
/NO
/NO
/vV
/N
/NE
/NO
/NO
/NL
/vV
/NL
/NvV
/NE
/vV
 /NL
/NE
/vV
/NL
/NvVO
/vV
/vV
/NOvV
/N
/NE
/vV
 /NL
/NE
/NvVE
/NL
/vV
/NO
/NE
/NO
/NE
 /NL
/NO
/NE
/NL
  /N
/NE
/vV
/NE
/NE
 /NL
/vV
/vV
/NE
/vV
/N
/NO
/vV
/NO
/vV
/NO
/NvV
/N
/NO
/NO
/vV
/NE
/NE
/vV
/N
/vV
/NOvV
/NO
/vV
/NL
 /NO
/N
/vV
/NO
/NE
/NE
/NL
/vV
/NO
  /N
/NO
/NL
/vV
/NE
/NE
/NO
/N
/vV
/NL
/NE
/NL
  /NL
/NE
/vV
/N
 /NL
/NO
/vV
/NO
/NE
/vV
/NE
/vV
/NE
/NE
 /N
/NO
/NvV
/NL
/NL
 /N
/NE
/vV
/vV
/NL
/NvV
 /NL
/NO
/vV
/NO
/vV
/NL
/NvV
/N
/NE
/NOE
 /NO
 /NE
/NO
/vV
/NE
 /N
/NO
/vV
/NL
/vV
/NE
  /N
/NE
/NvV
/NL
/NE
